Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB318.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage for Postacute Neurorehabilitation.--(a) All group or individual health or sickness or accident insurance policies providing hospital or medical/surgical coverage and all group or individual subscriber contracts or certificates issued by any entity subject to 40 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations), this act, the act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act, or an employe welfare benefit plan as defined in section 3 of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-406, 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.) providing hospital or medical/surgical coverage shall also provide coverage for postacute neurorehabilitation for an acquired brain injury. Coverage under this section shall include medically necessary treatment related to or as a result of an acquired brain injury, including cognitive communication therapy, cognitive rehabilitation therapy, neurobehavioral therapy, neurophysiological testing and treatment, neuropsychological testing and treatment, functional rehabilitation therapy, community reintegration services, postacute transitional rehabilitation treatment and day rehabilitation treatment and provide for such services as needed in facility and home and community-based settings.(b) Prior to payment for postacute neurorehabilitation services, an insurer shall verify that the neurorehabilitation individual practitioners and treatment facilities provide services within the scope of the services provided under a Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities accredited rehabilitation program for brain injury or another nationally recognized accredited rehabilitation program for brain injury and are qualified to provide postacute care rehabilitation services through possession of the appropriate licenses, accreditation, training and experience deemed customary and routine in the trade practice and according to criteria set out in the Office of Long-Term Living's Home and 20250SB0318PN0252 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Community-Based Community HealthChoices Waiver.(c) Coverage under this section may not limit the number of days of covered postacute care, including any therapy or treatment or rehabilitation, testing, remediation or other service described under this section, or the number of days of covered inpatient care to the extent that the treatment or care is determined to be medically necessary as a result of and related to an acquired brain injury. The insured's or enrollee's treating physician shall determine whether treatment or care is medically necessary for purposes of this paragraph in consultation with the treatment or care provider, the insured or enrollee and, if appropriate, members of the insured's or enrollee's family. Any limitations shall be separately stated by the Insurance Department.(d) Coverage under this section shall not be subject to any greater deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any other benefit provided by the Insurance Department.(e) The Insurance Department shall promulgate rules and regulations that require an insurer to provide adequate training to personnel responsible for preauthorization of coverage or utilization review for services under this section.(f) This section shall not apply to the following types of policies:(1) Accident only.(2) Limited benefit.(3) Credit.(4) Dental.(5) Vision.(6) Specified disease.20250SB0318PN0252 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Medicare supplement.(8) Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services supplement.(9) Long-term care or disability income.(10) Workers' compensation.(11) Automobile medical payment.(12) Fixed indemnity.(13) Hospital indemnity.(g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Acquired brain injury" means an injury to the brain that occurs after birth and can be caused by infectious diseases, metabolic disorders, endocrine disorders or diminished oxygen, brain tumors, toxins, disease that affects the blood supply to the brain, stroke or a traumatic brain injury."Cognitive communication therapy" means the treatment of problems with communication that have an underlying cause in a cognitive deficit rather than a primary language or speech deficit."Cognitive rehabilitation therapy" means a process of relearning cognitive skills essential for daily living through the coordinated specialized, integrated therapeutic treatments which are provided in dynamic settings designed for efficient and effective relearning following damage to brain cells or brain chemistry due to brain injury."Community reintegration services" means incremental guided real-world therapeutic training to develop skills essential for an individual to participate in life to re-enter employment, to go to school and engage in other productive activity, to safely 20250SB0318PN0252 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 live independently and to participate in their community while avoiding rehospitalization and long-term support needs."Day rehabilitation treatment" means a program that provides assistance with acquisition, retention or improvement in self-help, socialization and adaptive skills which is accomplished through comprehensive day rehabilitation programming to acquire more independent functioning and improved cognition, communication and life skills."Functional rehabilitation therapy" means a structured approach to rehabilitation for brain disorders which emphasizes learning by doing and focuses relearning a specific task in a prescribed format with maximum opportunity for repeated correct practice. Compensatory strategies are developed for those skills which are persistently impaired and individuals are trained on daily implementation."Neurobehavioral therapy" means a set of medical and therapeutic assessment and treatments focused on behavioral impairments associated with brain disease or injury and the amelioration of such impairments through the development of pro-social behavior."Neurophysiological testing and treatment" means a set of medical and therapeutic assessment and treatments focused on psychophysiological disorders or physical disorders associated with central nervous system dysfunction."Neuropsychological testing and treatment" means a set of medical and therapeutic assessment and treatments focused on evaluating the cognitive, emotional, psychosocial and behavioral deficits caused by brain injury."Preauthorization" means the provision of a reliable representation to a physician or health care provider of whether 20250SB0318PN0252 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an insurer will pay the physician or health care provider for proposed medical or health care services if the physician or health care provider provides the services to the patient for whom the services are proposed. The term includes precertification, certification, recertification or any other activity that involves providing a reliable representation by the issuer to a physician or health care provider."Postacute transitional rehabilitation treatment" means integrated medical and therapeutic services, treatment, education and skills training within a 24/7 real-world environment of care in a home and community setting.Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, the addition of section 635.11 of the act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, the addition of section 635.11 of the act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0318PN0252 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425